Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.440

ESD as self-insurer—Authority.

The board of directors of any educational service district is authorized to enter into agreements with the board of directors of any local school district and/or other educational service districts to form a self-insurance group for the purpose of qualifying as a self-insurer under chapter 51.14 RCW.

[ 1982 c 191 s 9. Formerly RCW 28A.21.255.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 191: See note following RCW 28A.335.210.

Educational service districts as self-insurers: RCW 51.14.150 and 51.14.160.